Ohio, session 136, HB944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5139.15 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5139.15. A facility operated by or contracted by the department of youth services, a secure facility, a detention center, a community corrections facility, a juvenile correctional facility, or a community residential program shall do all of the following: (A) Develop and maintain policies on health care and education, including minimum standards for access to health care and education; (B) Review and update the policies on health care and education regularly; (C) Make the policies on health care and education available to the public on the facility's, center's, or program's web site; (D) Upon request, make a paper copy of the policies on health care and education available to a member of the public.